Utah statutes.
41-1a-1209.   Exemptions from registration fees.
(1)  A fee may not be charged for the registration of ambulances, law
enforcement vehicles, fire engines, and passenger cars and trucks owned and
used by the United States government or by the state of Utah or any of its
political subdivisions.
(2)  A fee may not be charged municipal corporations for the issuance of any
certificate of title or registration or a duplicate certificate of title or
registration.
